District of Columbia statutes.
32-1310

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held invalid, the remainder of the chapter, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History

Aug. 3, 1956, 70 Stat. 979, ch. 924, § 10

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-110.
1973 Ed., § 36-110.